Utah statutes.
72-4-137.   State highways -- SR-311 to SR-320, SR-491.
State highways include:
(1)  SR-311.  From Route 40 northerly to the boat ramp at Starvation Lake
State Park.
(2)  SR-312.  From the parking area at the south marina of Willard Bay State
Park east to a local road.
(3)  SR-313.  From the camping area at Dead Horse Point northerly to Route 191
near Seven Mile Canyon.
(4)  SR-314.  From Route 189 northwesterly to the boat ramp at Deer Creek Lake
State Recreation area.
(5)  SR-315.  From the parking area at the marina of Willard Bay North State
Recreation Area northerly to 750 North in Willard, then east to Route 89.
(6)  SR-316.  From the Great Goosenecks of the San Juan State Park
northeasterly to Route 261.
(7)  SR-317.  Roads and parking areas at the Calvin L. Rampton Complex.
(8)  SR-318.  From Route 9 northerly to Quail Creek State Park pay gate.
(9)  SR-319.  From the southbound on and off ramps of Route 40, Mayflower
Interchange southeasterly to the Jordanelle State Park fee station.
(10)  SR-320.  Department of Public Safety Emergency Vehicle Operation Range
at Camp Williams.
(11)  SR-491.  From Route 191 at Monticello east to the Utah-Colorado state
line.
